Utah statutes.
59-2-326.   Assessment roll delivered to county treasurer.
Before November 1, the county auditor must deliver the corrected assessment
roll to the county treasurer, together with a signed statement subscribed by
him in a form substantially as follows:
I, ____ county auditor of the county of ____, do swear that I received the
accompanying assessment roll of the taxable property of the county from the
assessor, and that I have corrected it and made it conform to the requirements
of the county board of equalization and commission, that I have reckoned the
respective sums due as taxes and have added up the columns of valuations,
taxes, and acreage as required by law.
